test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-viezzad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - viežžâđ: # MLO, checked

    viežžâđ+V+Inf: viežžâđ
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežžuum
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäžžoo
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viäžžojeen
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viäžžojeh
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viežžuu
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viäžžojim
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viežžui
    viežžâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viäžžojii
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežâstâm
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viežâst
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viežâsteen
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viežâsteh
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viežâst
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viežâstim
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viežâstij
    viežžâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viežâstii
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežâdâm
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viežâd
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viežâdeen
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viežâdeh
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viežâd
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viežâdim
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viežâdij
    viežžâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viežâdii
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežâttâm
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viežât
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viežâtteen
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viežâtteh
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viežât
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viežâttim
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viežâttij
    viežžâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viežâttii
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežâškuáđám
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viežâškuát
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viežâškyetteen
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viežâškyeteh
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viežâškyetih
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viežâškyeđe
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viežâškuottim
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viežâškuođij
    viežžâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viežâškuottii
    
    
  Verb - vuoiŋâđ: # MLO, checked

    vuoiŋâđ+V+Inf: vuoiŋâđ
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoiŋuum
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáiŋoo
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuáiŋojeen
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuáiŋojeh
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuoiŋuu
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuáiŋojim
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuoiŋui
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuáiŋojii
    
